Hawaii statutes.
§11-99 Members of Congress, applicability
of election laws. The nomination and election of a senator or
representative to Congress shall be in conformity to the laws applicable to the
election of members of the state legislature except as expressly otherwise
provided or where in conflict with federal law. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next